Missouri, session 2026, HB3149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.547, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 67.547 and 67.5420, to read as follows:
67.547. 1. In addition to the tax authorized by section 67.505, any county as defined
in section 67.750 may, by a majority vote of its governing body, impose an additional county
sales tax on all sales which are subject to taxation under the provisions of sections 144.010 to
144.525. The tax authorized by this section shall be in addition to any and all other sales tax
allowed by law; except that no ordinance or order imposing a sales tax under the provisions of
this section shall be effective unless the governing body of the county submits to the voters of
the county, at a county or state general, primary or special election, a proposal to authorize the
governing body of the county to impose such tax.
2. The ballot of submission shall contain, but need not be limited to the following
language:
Shall the county of ______ (county's name) impose a countywide
sales tax of ______ (insert rate) percent for the purpose of _____
_ (insert purpose)?
YES NO
If you are in favor of the question, place an "X" in the box
opposite "YES". If you are opposed to the question, place an
"X" in the box opposite "NO".
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3149 2

If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting thereon are in
favor of the proposal, then the ordinance or order and any amendments thereto shall be in
effect. If a majority of the votes cast by the qualified voters voting are opposed to the
proposal, then the governing body of the county shall have no power to impose the sales tax
as herein authorized unless and until the governing body of the county submits another
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the sales tax under the
provisions of this section and such proposal is approved by a majority of the qualified voters
voting thereon. A county shall not submit to the voters a proposed sales tax under this section
for a period of two years from the date of an election in which the county previously
submitted to the voters a proposed sales tax under this section, regardless of whether the
initial proposed sales tax was approved or disapproved by the voters. The revenue collected
from the sales tax authorized under this section shall only be used for the purpose approved
by voters of the county.
3. (1) The sales tax may be imposed at a rate of one-eighth of one percent, one-fourth
of one percent, three-eighths of one percent, or one-half of one percent on the receipts from
the sale at retail of all tangible personal property or taxable services at retail within any
county adopting such tax if such property and services are subject to taxation by the state of
Missouri under the provisions of sections 144.010 to 144.525. In any city not within a county
or any county described in subsection 5 of this section, no sales tax for the purpose of funding
zoological activities and zoological facilities as those terms are defined in section 184.500
shall exceed a rate of one-eighth of one percent unless the sales tax was levied and collected
before August 28, 2017. Beginning August 28, 2017, no county shall submit to the voters any
proposal that results in a combined rate of sales taxes adopted under this section in excess of
one percent.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
contrary, beginning August 28, 2025, a county with more than eight thousand but fewer than
eight thousand nine hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than seven hundred
thirty but fewer than eight hundred inhabitants may impose a sales tax that results in a
combined rate of sales tax adopted pursuant to this section in excess of one percent, but not in
excess of one and one-half percent, provided that any such sales tax shall be for the purpose
of providing law enforcement services. All sales tax elections conducted during the
November 8, 2022, general election shall be deemed in compliance with this subdivision,
provided that the total combined sales tax rate adopted pursuant to this section does not
exceed one and one-half percent.
4. Except as modified in this section, all provisions of sections 32.085 and 32.087
shall apply to the tax imposed under this section.

HB 3149 3
5. In any first class county having a charter form of government and having a
population of nine hundred thousand or more, the proceeds of the sales tax authorized by this
section shall be distributed so that an amount equal to three-eighths of the proceeds of the tax
shall be distributed to the county and the remaining five-eighths shall be distributed to the
cities, towns and villages and the unincorporated area of the county on the ratio that the
population of each bears to the total population of the county. Three-eighths of the tax rate
adopted by such a county shall be included in the calculation of the county's one percent
combined tax rate ceiling provided in subsection 3 of this section. The population of each
city, town or village and the unincorporated area of the county and the total population of the
county shall be determined on the basis of the most recent federal decennial census. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the revenue collected is used to support
zoological activities of the zoological subdistrict as defined under section 184.352. The
provisions of this subsection shall not apply if the revenue collected is used for the
purpose of early childhood education services, and such revenues shall be deposited in
the early childhood education fund and administered pursuant to section 67.5420.
6. Except as prohibited under section 184.353, residents of any county that does not
adopt a sales tax under this section for the purpose of supporting zoological activities may be
charged an admission fee for zoological facilities, programs, or events that are not part of the
zoological subdistrict defined under subdivision (15) of section 184.352 as of August 28,
2017.
7. In any county of the second classification with more than nineteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than nineteen thousand eight hundred inhabitants, the proceeds of the sales
tax authorized by this section shall be distributed so that an amount equal to three-fourths of
the proceeds of the tax shall be distributed to the county and the remaining one-fourth shall be
distributed equally among the incorporated cities, towns, and villages of the county. Upon
request from any city, town, or village within the county, the county shall make available for
inspection the distribution report provided to the county by the department of revenue. Any
expenses incurred by the county in supplying such report to a city, town, or village shall be
paid by such city, town, or village.
8. In any first class county having a charter form of government and having a
population of nine hundred thousand or more, no tax shall be imposed pursuant to this section
for the purpose of funding in whole or in part the construction, operation or maintenance of a
sports stadium, field house, indoor or outdoor recreational facility, center, playing field,
parking facility or anything incidental or necessary to a complex suitable for any type of
professional sport or recreation, either upon, above or below the ground.
9. No county in this state, other than a county with a charter form of government and
with more than nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants and a city not within a county, shall

HB 3149 4
impose a tax under this section for the purpose of funding in whole or in part the construction,
operation, or maintenance of any zoological activities, zoological facilities, zoological
organizations, the metropolitan zoological park and museum district as created under section
184.350, or any zoological boards.
10. The director of revenue may authorize the state treasurer to make refunds from
the amounts in the trust fund and credited to any county for erroneous payments and
overpayments made, and may redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of
such counties. If any county abolishes the tax, the county shall notify the director of revenue
100 of the action at least ninety days prior to the effective date of the repeal and the director of
101 revenue may order retention in the trust fund, for a period of one year, of two percent of the
102 amount collected after receipt of such notice to cover possible refunds or overpayment of the
103 tax and to redeem dishonored checks and drafts deposited to the credit of such accounts.
104 After one year has elapsed after the effective date of abolition of the tax in such county, the
105 director of revenue shall remit the balance in the account to the county and close the account
106 of that county. The director of revenue shall notify each county of each instance of any
107 amount refunded or any check redeemed from receipts due the county.
108 11. No revenue received from a tax for the purpose of funding zoological activities in
109 any county shall be used for the benefit of any entity that has ever been named Grant's Farm
110 or is located at ten thousand five hundred one Gravois Road, Saint Louis, Missouri, or
111 successor address, or to supplant any funding received from the metropolitan zoological park
112 and museum district established under section 184.350.
67.5420. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, all revenues
generated by any tax imposed by a county or by a city not within a county and approved
by the voters for the purposes of establishing an early childhood education fund to
improve the quality of, affordability of, and access to early childhood development
programs for children aged five years and younger may be deposited in the county
treasury or, in a city not within a county, to a board of directors established pursuant to
section 210.861, to the credit of a special "Early Childhood Education Fund" to
accomplish the purposes set out herein and shall be used for no other purpose.
2. (1) The administrative control and management of the funds in the early
childhood education fund and all programs to be funded therefrom shall rest solely with
the board of directors established pursuant to section 210.861. The board shall not be
mandated to expend funds by an act of state legislation without a majority vote of the
voters of the county or city not within a county. The board of directors shall use or
disburse the funds in the early childhood education fund to provide and administer
programs improving the quality, affordability, and access to early childhood
development programs for children aged five years and younger, prioritizing children

HB 3149 5
in financial need. The funds may be used for early education and care provided by
public, private, not-for-profit, and for-profit entities licensed, license-exempt, or
registered by the Missouri department of elementary and secondary education,
including preschools, child care centers, nursery schools, local education agencies,
Head Start and early Head Start programs, informal child care providers and
independent and system-affiliated family child care homes, and transportation related
to same.
(2) The board of directors may contract with any person or entity to provide
programs or services relating to the programs described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection and may place conditions on the use of such funds. The board shall reserve
the right to audit the expenditure of any and all funds. The board may establish
eligibility standards for the receipt and use of such funds. No member of the board shall
serve on the governing body, have any financial interest in, or be employed by any entity
that is a recipient of funds from the early childhood education fund.
(3) The board of directors may accept any gift of property or moneys for the use
and benefit of the persons to be served through the programs established and funded
under this section and may sell or exchange any such property so long as such sale or
exchange is in the best interests of the programs provided under this section and the
proceeds from such sale or exchange are used exclusively to fund such programs. The
board of directors may solicit, accept, and expend grants from private or public entities
and enter into agreements to effectuate such grants so long as the transaction is in the
best interest of the programs provided by the board and the proceeds are used
exclusively to fund such programs.
(4) The provisions of subsections 3 to 6 of section 210.861 shall not apply to
revenues deposited into the early childhood education fund and administered pursuant
to this subsection.
✔